Oklahoma, session 2025, SB617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 328 of Title 75, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any permanent rule promulgated or amended on or after the


effective date of this act shall automatically terminate one (1)


year from the date that the rule goes into effect.


B. A rule subject to termination under this section may be


renewed for additional terms of one (1) year, or less, by the


Legislature by approval and enactment of a joint resolution.





Req. No. 805 Page 1


C. Nothing in this section shall preclude the ability of the


Legislature to repeal a permanent rule prior to the automatic


termination of the rule under this section.


D. An agency may request the renewal by the Legislature of a


rule subject to automatic termination under this section. The


request shall be submitted no less than four (4) months, and no more


than six (6) months, prior to the date that the rule is set to


terminate. The agency shall demonstrate why renewal of the rule is


necessary and shall include a cost-benefit analysis. The agency


shall also publish the request on its website.


E. The Secretary of State shall provide notice to the


promulgating agency at least four (4) months prior to every rule’s


termination date.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-805 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:08 AM

















Req. No. 805 Page 2